Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-965
Community college area; education programs; contract to provide.

Any community college area or institution may contract to provide for the delivery of education programs within institutions operated by any state agency or within any geographic area administered by a federal agency or tribal authority.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 49.